Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.16, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Contents of correction orders and conditional licenses. (a) If the commissioner finds that the applicant or license holder has failed to comply with an applicable law or rule and this failure does not imminently endanger the health, safety, or rights of the persons served by the program, the commissioner may issue a correction order and an order of conditional license to the applicant or license holder. When issuing a conditional license, the commissioner shall consider the nature, chronicity, or severity of the violation of law or rule and the effect of the violation on the health, safety, or rights of persons served by the program. The correction order or conditional license must state the following in plain language: (1) the conditions that constitute a violation of the law or rule; new text begin (2) whether the conditions were self-reported by the applicant or license holder; new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the specific law or rule violated; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end the time allowed to correct each violation; and deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end if a license is made conditional, the length and terms of the conditional license, and the reasons for making the license conditional. (b) Nothing in this section prohibits the commissioner from proposing a sanction as specified in section 142B.18, prior to issuing a correction order or conditional license. (c) The commissioner may issue a correction order and an order of conditional license to the applicant or license holder through the provider licensing and reporting hub. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.16, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Posting orders on department website. new text end new text begin If the commissioner posts on the department's website an order of conditional license or a correction order for a licensed family child care provider or child care center, then the summary information posted for the order must include, at a minimum, whether the license holder self-reported the conditions that constitute the violation of law or rule cited in the order. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.17, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Fix-it ticket. (a) In lieu of a correction order under section 142B.16, the commissioner shall issue a fix-it ticket to a family child care or child care center license holder if the commissioner finds that: (1) the license holder has failed to comply with a requirement in this chapter or Minnesota Rules, chapter 9502 or 9503, that the commissioner determines to be eligible for a fix-it ticket; (2) the violation does not imminently endanger the health, safety, or rights of the persons served by the program; (3) the license holder did not receive a fix-it ticket or correction order for the violation at the license holder's last licensing inspection; (4) the violation can be corrected at the time of inspection or within 48 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays; and (5) the license holder corrects the violation at the time of inspection or agrees to correct the violation within 48 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. (b) The fix-it ticket must state: (1) the conditions that constitute a violation of the law or rule; new text begin (2) whether the conditions were self-reported by the license holder; new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the specific law or rule violated; and deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end that the violation was corrected at the time of inspection or must be corrected within 48 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. (c) The commissioner shall not publicly publish a fix-it ticket on the department's website. (d) Within 48 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, of receiving a fix-it ticket, the license holder must correct the violation and within one week submit evidence to the licensing agency that the violation was corrected. (e) If the violation is not corrected at the time of inspection or within 48 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, or the evidence submitted is insufficient to establish that the license holder corrected the violation, the commissioner must issue a correction order for the violation of Minnesota law or rule identified in the fix-it ticket according to section 142B.16. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.171, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Documented technical assistance. (a) In lieu of a correction order under section 142B.16, the commissioner shall provide documented technical assistance to a family child care or child care center license holder if the commissioner finds that: (1) the license holder has failed to comply with a requirement in this chapter or Minnesota Rules, chapter 9502 or 9503, that the commissioner determines to be low risk as determined by the child care weighted risk system; (2) the noncompliance does not imminently endanger the health, safety, or rights of the persons served by the program; and (3) the license holder did not receive documented technical assistance or a correction order for the same violation at the license holder's most recent annual licensing inspection. (b) Documented technical assistance must include communication from the commissioner to the license holder that: (1) states the conditions that constitute a violation of a law or rule; new text begin (2) identifies whether the conditions were self-reported by the license holder; new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end references the specific law or rule violated; and deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end explains remedies for correcting the violation. (c) The commissioner shall not publicly publish documented technical assistance on the department's website. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.18, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6a. new text end new text begin Indication of self-report. new text end new text begin (a) For an order of license suspension, temporary immediate suspension, a fine, or revocation issued by the commissioner to a licensed family child care provider or child care center under this section, the order must indicate whether the conditions that constitute the violation of law or rule were self-reported by the license holder. new text end new text begin (b) If the commissioner posts on the department's website an order of license suspension, temporary immediate suspension, a fine, or revocation for a licensed family child care provider or child care center, then the summary information posted for the order must include, at a minimum, whether the license holder self-reported the conditions that constitute the violation of law or rule cited in the order. new text end